my_app/dictionaries/hunspell-la/la_LA.aff
SFX s Y 722
SFX s us      issimus         us        
SFX s us      issime          us        
SFX s us      issimum         us        
SFX s us      issimi          us        
SFX s us      issimo          us        
SFX s us      issima          us        
SFX s us      issimam         us        
SFX s us      issimae         us        
SFX s us      issimæ          us        
SFX s us      issimos         us        
SFX s us      issimis         us        
SFX s us      issimas         us        
SFX s us      issimarum       us        
SFX s us      issimorum       us        
SFX s us      issumus         us        
SFX s us      issume          us        
SFX s us      issumum         us        
SFX s us      issumi          us        
SFX s us      issumo          us        
SFX s us      issuma          us        
SFX s us      issumam         us        
SFX s us      issumae         us        
SFX s us      issumæ          us        
SFX s us      issumos         us        
SFX s us      issumis         us        
SFX s us      issumas         us        
SFX s us      issumarum       us        
SFX s us      issumorum       us        
SFX s 0       que             us        
SFX s 0       ne              us        
SFX s 0       ve              us        
SFX s 0       ue              us          
SFX s us      issimusque      us        
SFX s us      issimusne       us        
SFX s us      issimusve       us        
SFX s us      issimusue       us          
SFX s us      issimeque       us        
SFX s us      issimene        us        
SFX s us      issimeve        us        
SFX s us      issimeue        us          
SFX s us      issimumque      us        
SFX s us      issimumne       us        
SFX s us      issimumve       us        
SFX s us      issimumue       us          
SFX s us      issimique       us        
SFX s us      issimine        us        
SFX s us      issimive        us        
SFX s us      issimiue        us          
SFX s us      issimoque       us        
SFX s us      issimone        us        
SFX s us      issimove        us        
SFX s us      issimoue        us          
SFX s us      issimaque       us        
SFX s us      issimane        us        
SFX s us      issimave        us        
SFX s us      issimaue        us          
SFX s us      issimamque      us        
SFX s us      issimamne       us        
SFX s us      issimamve       us        
SFX s us      issimamue       us          
SFX s us      issimaeque      us        
SFX s us      issimaene       us        
SFX s us      issimaeve       us        
SFX s us      issimaeue       us          
SFX s us      issimæque       us        
SFX s us      issimæne        us        
SFX s us      issimæve        us        
SFX s us      issimæue        us          
SFX s us      issimosque      us        
SFX s us      issimosne       us        
SFX s us      issimosve       us        
SFX s us      issimosue       us          
SFX s us      issimisque      us        
SFX s us      issimisne       us        
SFX s us      issimisve       us        
SFX s us      issimisue       us          
SFX s us      issimasque      us        
SFX s us      issimasne       us        
SFX s us      issimasve       us        
SFX s us      issimasue       us          
SFX s us      issimarumque    us        
SFX s us      issimarumne     us        
SFX s us      issimarumve     us        
SFX s us      issimarumue     us          
SFX s us      issimorumque    us        
SFX s us      issimorumne     us        
SFX s us      issimorumve     us        
SFX s us      issimorumue     us          
SFX s us      issumusque      us        
SFX s us      issumusne       us        
SFX s us      issumusve       us        
SFX s us      issumusue       us          
SFX s us      issumeque       us        
SFX s us      issumene        us        
SFX s us      issumeve        us        
SFX s us      issumeue        us          
SFX s us      issumumque      us        
SFX s us      issumumne       us        
SFX s us      issumumve       us        
SFX s us      issumumue       us          
SFX s us      issumique       us        
SFX s us      issumine        us        
SFX s us      issumive        us        
SFX s us      issumiue        us          
SFX s us      issumoque       us        
SFX s us      issumone        us        
SFX s us      issumove        us        
SFX s us      issumoue        us          
SFX s us      issumaque       us        
SFX s us      issumane        us        
SFX s us      issumave        us        
SFX s us      issumave        us          
SFX s us      issumamque      us        
SFX s us      issumamne       us        
SFX s us      issumamve       us        
SFX s us      issumamue       us          
SFX s us      issumaeque      us        
SFX s us      issumaene       us        
SFX s us      issumaeve       us        
SFX s us      issumaeue       us          
SFX s us      issumæque       us        
SFX s us      issumæne        us        
SFX s us      issumæve        us        
SFX s us      issumæue        us          
SFX s us      issumosque      us        
SFX s us      issumosne       us        
SFX s us      issumosve       us        
SFX s us      issumosue       us          
SFX s us      issumisque      us        
SFX s us      issumisne       us        
SFX s us      issumisve       us        
SFX s us      issumisue       us          
SFX s us      issumasque      us        
SFX s us      issumasne       us        
SFX s us      issumasve       us        
SFX s us      issumasue       us          
SFX s us      issumarumque    us        
SFX s us      issumarumne     us        
SFX s us      issumarumve     us        
SFX s us      issumarumue     us          
SFX s us      issumorumque    us        
SFX s us      issumorumne     us        
SFX s us      issumorumve     us        
SFX s us      issumorumue     us          
SFX s vs      issimvs         vs        
SFX s vs      issime          vs        
SFX s vs      issimvm         vs        
SFX s vs      issimi          vs        
SFX s vs      issimo          vs        
SFX s vs      issima          vs        
SFX s vs      issimam         vs        
SFX s vs      issimae         vs        
SFX s vs      issimæ          vs        
SFX s vs      issimos         vs        
SFX s vs      issimis         vs        
SFX s vs      issimas         vs        
SFX s vs      issimarvm       vs        
SFX s vs      issimorvm       vs        
SFX s vs      issvmvs         vs        
SFX s vs      issvme          vs        
SFX s vs      issvmvm         vs        
SFX s vs      issvmi          vs        
SFX s vs      issvmo          vs        
SFX s vs      issvma          vs        
SFX s vs      issvmam         vs        
SFX s vs      issvmae         vs        
SFX s vs      issvmæ          vs        
SFX s vs      issvmos         vs        
SFX s vs      issvmis         vs        
SFX s vs      issvmas         vs        
SFX s vs      issvmarvm       vs        
SFX s vs      issvmorvm       vs        
SFX s 0       qve             vs        
SFX s 0       ne              vs        
SFX s 0       ve              vs        
SFX s vs      issimvsqve      vs        
SFX s vs      issimvsne       vs        
SFX s vs      issimvsve       vs        
SFX s vs      issimeqve       vs        
SFX s vs      issimene        vs        
SFX s vs      issimeve        vs        
SFX s vs      issimvmqve      vs        
SFX s vs      issimvmne       vs        
SFX s vs      issimvmve       vs        
SFX s vs      issimiqve       vs        
SFX s vs      issimine        vs        
SFX s vs      issimive        vs        
SFX s vs      issimoqve       vs        
SFX s vs      issimone        vs        
SFX s vs      issimove        vs        
SFX s vs      issimaqve       vs        
SFX s vs      issimane        vs        
SFX s vs      issimave        vs        
