my_app/dictionaries/hunspell-la/la_LA.dic
accommodativus/abcrs
adfectuosus/abcrs
adpotus/abcrs
adulescentis/dfgrs
aestuosus/abcrs
albidus/abcrs
amicalis/fgqrst
apparatus/abcrs
arcanus/abcrs
aspernabilis/fgqrs
audacis/fgrst
beneficus/abcrs
callentis/fqrs
catacis/fgrs
clamosus/abcrs
coloratus/abcrs
compectus/abcrs
conciliatus/abcrs
concedentis/fgqrs
conglobatus/abcrs
conmutabilis/fgqrst
conrumptus/abcrs
consuetus/abcrs
contritus/abcrs
correctus/abcrs
criticus/abcrs
cupientis/fgrs
dealbatus/abcrs
defecabilis/fgqrst
deminutus/abcrs
deruptus/abcrs
destrictus/abcrs
differtus/abcrs
dilucidus/abcrs
disertus/abcrs
dissonus/abcrs
divorsus/abcrs
durabilis/fgqrst
ecficientis/fgrst
effectuosus/abcrs
effrontis/ders
elimatus/abcrs
ementiticius/abcrs
eruditus/abcrs
excitatorius/abcrs
exhortatorius/abcrs
experimentosus/abcrs
expretus/abcrs
exsertus/abcrs
exsuperabilis/fgqrst
fabellatoris/s
falsiloquacis/fgrst
fatigabilis/fgqrs
ferus/abcrs
fidus/abcrs
flammeus/abcrs
floreus/abcrs
foetosus/abcrs
fragosus/abcrs
frugalis/fgqrst
fundatus/abcrs
futtilis/fgqrst
gibbosus/abcrs
glorius/abcrs
grandaevus/abcrs
habitus/abcrs
hircuosus/abcrs
horridus/abcrs
ignavus/abcrs
illiberalis/fgqrst
immaculatus/abcrs
immotus/abcrs
imperceptus/abcrs
implacabilis/fgqrst
improbatus/abcrs
inabscondibilis/fgqrst
incallidus/abcrs
incolumis/fgqrst
indecorus/abcrs
inelegantis/fgrst
inferus/abcrs
infrequentis/fgrst
inhospitus/abcrs
inluster/qs
inmodestus/abcrs
inordinatus/abcrs
inpermutabilis/fgqrst
inportabilis/fgqrst
inprovidus/abcrs
inrisorius/abcrs
insolentis/fgqrst
insulsus/abcrs
intolerabilis/fgqrst
involutus/abcrs
irrisorius/abcrs
laboriosus/abcrs
laeatantis/fgrst
latebrosus/abcrs
lentus/abcrs
limpidus/abcrs
lubricus/abcrs
macilentus/abcrs
maleloquus/abcrs
medicosus/abcrs
miserabilis/fgqrst
mundus/abcrs
nefandus/abcrs
notus/abcrs
obsequentis/fgrst
odoratus/abcrs
ordinatus/abcrs
paludosus/abcrs
parricidalis/fgqrst
patriarchalis/fgqrst
pavidus/abcrs
penetralis/fgrst
peragrantis/fgrst
peratticus/abcrs
percommodus/abcrs
perditus/abcrs
perexpeditus/abcrs
perflagitiosus/abcrs
pergraphicus/abcrs
perincommodus/abcrs
periratus/abcrs
perlucidulus/abcrs
permundus/abcrs
peropportunus/abcrs
perpetualis/fgqrst
perpulsus/abcrs
persenilis/fgqrst
perstudiosus/abcrs
pertristis/fgqrst
pervetustus/abcrs
pestilentiosus/abcrs
piger/qs
placabilis/fgqrst
plectripotentis/fgrst
poeticus/abcrs
pompulentus/abcrs
postularius/abcrs
praecluis/fgqrs
praemetuentis/fgrst
praesiccus/abcrs
praetimidus/abcrs
prestantis/fgrst
profusus/abcrs
protumidus/abcrs
putidus/abcrs
refusus/abcrs
rubentis/fgrs
saxosus/abcrs
seditiosus/abcrs
severus/abcrs
solidus/abcrs
sperabilis/fgqrst
stridulus/abcrs
subrefectus/abcrs
suppallidus/abcrs
tenacis/fgrst
tolerantis/fgrst
tremidus/abcrs
udus/abcrs
unus/abcs
vegrandis/fgqrst
vietus/abcrs
abrvptvs/abcrs
adpotvs/abcrs
afflictvs/abcrs
approbvs/abcrs
avstervs/abcrs
carnosvs/abcrs
commodvs/abcrs
confaecatvs/abcrs
conrvptvs/abcrs
corporosvs/abcrs
cvratvs/abcrs
demissvs/abcrs
differtvs/abcrs
dissolvtvs/abcrs
ecfectvosvs/abcrs
electvs/abcrs
exaggeratvs/abcrs
expetendvs/abcrs
exsvccvs/abcrs
falsvs/abcrs
fictiosvs/abcrs
flvctvosvs/abcrs
fretvs/abcrs
fvribvndvs/abcrs
glorivs/abcrs
hivlcvs/abcrs
illvminatvs/abcrs
imperitvs/abcrs
inaeqvabilis/fgqrst
indoctvs/abcrs
inglorivs/abcrs
inmotvs/abcrs
inpraepeditvs/abcrs
insolidvs/abcrs
invidiosvs/abcrs
lacertosvs/abcrs
leibertvs/abcrs
lvcvlentvs/abcrs
medicatvs/abcrs
navvs/abcrs
occallatvs/abcrs
pallidvs/abcrs
pavxillvlvs/abcrs
perargvtvs/abcrs
peregregivs/abcrs
perhonestvs/abcrs
perlavdabilis/fgqrst
perosvs/abcrs
persalsvs/abcrs
pervrbanvs/abcrs
pingvivscvlvs/abcrs
plvvivs/abcrs
praeclarvs/abcrs
praesvlsvs/abcrs
prodigvs/abcrs
protentvs/abcrs
pvtidvs/abcrs
remissvs/abcrs
sangvinolentvs/abcrs
secretvs/abcrs
siccvs/abcrs
spatiosvs/abcrs
stvpidvs/abcrs
svccrotillvs/abcrs
svspectvs/abcrs
tetricvs/abcrs
tremebvndvs/abcrs
vlvlabilis/fgqrst
vsitatvs/abcrs
vetvstvs/abcrs
auidus/abcrs
diuisus/abcrs
improuidus/abcrs
lasciuus/abcrs
persuauis/fgqrst
priuatus/abcrs
thelodiuitis/ders
uementis/fgrst
uilis/fgqrst
